Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PROPERTY TAX TASK FORCE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin (a) A property tax task force is established as provided under this section. The goals of the task force are to: new text end new text begin (1) investigate ways to reduce property tax on homestead properties; and new text end new text begin (2) present options for legislation that would provide property tax relief to homestead properties, including at least one option with minimal general fund impact. new text end new text begin (b) For the purpose of this section, "homestead property" means a residential homestead classified as 1a under Minnesota Statutes, section 273.13, subdivision 22, and the portion of class 2 property under Minnesota Statutes, section 273.13, subdivision 23, consisting of the house and garage and immediately surrounding one acre of land. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Considerations. new text end new text begin As part of its work, the task force must consider: new text end new text begin (1) the effectiveness of the homestead market value exclusion in lowering homestead property taxes relative to nonhomestead residential property; new text end new text begin (2) the effectiveness of the homestead market value exclusion in lowering homestead property taxes in 2025 compared to the effectiveness of the homestead market value exclusion in lowering homestead property taxes in 2011; new text end new text begin (3) whether changing property tax classification rates would be a preferred tool for reducing property tax on homestead properties, compared to the homestead market value exclusion; new text end new text begin (4) how property tax classification rates compare across all types of property by comparing classification rates of classifications containing similar types of property and exploring whether consolidating some classifications could be achieved in a way that reduces property tax on homestead properties; new text end new text begin (5) changes and trends in the share of property taxes paid by homestead properties from 2015 through 2025; new text end new text begin (6) changes and trends in the relative share of state and local property taxes paid by property classified as commercial, industrial, or public utility property under Minnesota Statutes, section 273.13, subdivision 24, clauses (1) to (3), from 2015 through 2025; and new text end new text begin (7) how noncommercial seasonal residential recreational, nonhomestead residential, and homestead property tax burdens compare in different areas of the state and how these properties were taxed in 2015 compared to 2025. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin The task force must consist of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) two state representatives, one appointed by each of the cochairs of the house of representatives Taxes Committee; new text end new text begin (2) two state senators, one appointed by the chair of the senate Taxes Committee and one appointed by the ranking minority member of the committee; new text end new text begin (3) the commissioner of revenue, or a designee; new text end new text begin (4) two people appointed by the Association of Minnesota Counties; new text end new text begin (5) two people appointed by the League of Minnesota Cities; new text end new text begin (6) one person appointed by the Minnesota Association of Townships; and new text end new text begin (7) one person appointed by the Minnesota Association of Assessing Officers. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) The task force must make advisory recommendations to the legislature on the goals outlined in subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of revenue or their designee must chair the initial meeting and the task force must elect a chair at that initial meeting. The task force will meet at the call of the chair. Members of the task force must serve without compensation. The commissioner of revenue must provide administrative support to the task force. Minnesota Statutes, chapter 13D, does not apply to meetings of this task force. Meetings of the task force must be open to the public and the task force must provide notice of a meeting at least seven days before the meeting. A meeting of the task force occurs when a quorum is present. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin The task force must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over property taxes no later than February 1, 2027. The report must contain the task force's advisory recommendations, draft legislation necessary to implement its recommendations, and any additional information the task force deems relevant. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The task force established by this section expires upon submission of the report under subdivision 5. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end